Utah, session 2026, SB207.
Section 1. Section 7-1-811 is enacted to read:7-1-811. Discriminatory practice of creditor prohibited.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Credit" means the right granted by a creditor to a person to:(i)defer payment of a debt;(ii)incur debt and defer the payment of that debt; or(iii)purchase property or services and defer payment for the property or services.(b)"Creditor" means a financial institution that:(i)regularly extends, renews, or continues credit, regardless of whether interest or a finance charge is required;(ii)regularly arranges for the extension, renewal, or continuation of credit, regardless of whether interest or a finance charge is required; or(iii)as an assignee of an original creditor, participates in the decision to extend, renew, or continue credit, regardless of whether interest or a finance charge is required.(c)"Credit reporting agency" means a person who, for monetary fees or dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly assembles or evaluates credit information for the purpose of furnishing a credit report to a creditor.(d)"Majority status" means the status of an individual as being 18 years old or older, as opposed to being less than 18 years old.(2)A creditor may not:(a)subject to Subsection (4)(a), discriminate against an applicant for credit in the granting, withholding, extending, or renewing of credit, or in the fixing of the rates, terms, or conditions of any form of credit, on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry;(b)except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), use or make any inquiry regarding religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry for the purpose of limiting, or specifying, a person to whom credit will be granted;(c)refuse to consider the sources of income of an applicant for credit, or disregard or ignore the income of an applicant, in whole or in part, on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, disability, national origin, genetics, or ancestry;(d)refuse to grant credit to an individual in a name that the individual customarily uses, if it has been determined in the normal course of business that the creditor will grant credit to the individual;(e)except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), impose a requirement for a co-obligor, for reapplication, or any other special requirements or conditions upon an applicant or class of applicant on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry in circumstances where similar requirements or conditions are not imposed on other similarly-situated applicants;(f)fail or refuse to provide an applicant for credit a written statement of the specific reasons for rejection of the application, in accordance with Subsection (4)(d), if requested in writing by the applicant within sixty days after the day of the rejection;(g)except as provided in Subsection (4)(e), fail or refuse to print on, or firmly attach to, each application for credit, in a type size no smaller than that used throughout most of the application form, the following notice:"Utah's laws against discrimination require that all creditors make credit equally available to all credit worthy customers, and that credit reporting agencies maintain separate credit histories on each individual upon request.";(h)fail or refuse on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, or ancestry to maintain, upon the request of the individual, a separate account for each individual to whom credit is extended; or(i)except as provided in Subsection (4)(f), with respect to an account established on or after May 6, 2026, fail or refuse on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry:(i)to maintain records on the account;(ii)to furnish information on the account to a credit reporting agency in a manner that clearly designates the contractual liability for repayment as indicated on the application for the account; or(iii)if more than one individual is contractually liable for repayment, to maintain records and furnish information in the name of each individual.(3)A credit reporting agency may not:(a)fail or refuse, on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry, to maintain, upon the request of the individual, a separate file on each individual about whom information is assembled or evaluated; or(b)fail or refuse on the basis of religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry to clearly note, maintain, and report information furnished to the credit reporting agency under Subsection (2)(i).(4)(a)Subsection (2)(a) does not prohibit disparate treatment, based solely on majority status, in relation to a real estate transaction between:(i)a financial institution, as defined in Section 7-26-102, and the customers of the financial institution;(ii)a dealer in intangibles and the customers of the dealer in intangibles; or(iii)an insurer, as defined in Section 31A-1-301, and the customers of the insurer.(b)Subsection (2)(b) does not prohibit:(i)an inquiry regarding marital status if the inquiry is made for the purpose of determining the creditor's rights and remedies applicable to the particular extension of credit; or(ii)a request for information, a record, a form, or an application by a creditor, if required of that particular creditor by:(A)an instrumentality or agency of the United States; or(B)an instrumentality or agency of the state, or a political subdivision of the state, for the purpose of enforcing the Fair Housing Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601, et seq.(c)Subsection (2)(e) does not prohibit a requirement or condition, with respect to majority status only:(i)in relation to a real estate transaction described in Subsection (4)(a)(i); or(ii)as the result of a program that:(A)grants preferences to certain age groups; and(B)is administered by an instrumentality or agency of the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state.(d)(i)A creditor shall provide the written statement of the specific reasons for rejection of an application, described in Subsection (2)(f), within 30 days after the day on which the creditor receives a timely written request for the statement from the applicant.(ii)A specific reason for rejection provided in the written statement described in Subsection (4)(d)(i) may include, if the specific reason is true and accurate, that the applicant was rejected:(A)solely on the basis of information received from a credit reporting agency; or(B)because the applicant failed to meet the uniformly applied standards required by the creditor's credit scoring system.(e)A creditor is not required to print or attach the notice described in Subsection (2)(g) in an application that has a multi-state distribution, if the creditor mails the notice to the applicant with the notice of acceptance or rejection of the application.(f)Subsection (2)(h) does not apply to an individual who is only contractually liable if the primary party defaults on the account.(5)This section does not prohibit a creditor from requesting the signature of both spouses to create a valid lien, pass clear title, or waive inchoate rights to property.(6)(a)A person aggrieved by a violation of this section by a creditor or a credit reporting agency may bring an action against the creditor or credit reporting agency in a court with jurisdiction within 180 days after the day on which the violation occurs.(b)If, in an action described in Subsection (6)(a), the court finds that a creditor or credit reporting agency violated, or is about to violate, a provision of this section with respect to the plaintiff, the court may grant the relief that the court determines appropriate, including:(i)granting a permanent or temporary injunction, a temporary restraining order, or another order;(ii)awarding to the plaintiff compensatory damages; or(iii)awarding reasonable attorney fees and court costs.(c)This section does not prohibit a creditor from reviewing an application for credit on the basis of established criteria used in the normal course of business for the determination of the credit worthiness of the applicant for credit, including the applicant's credit history.(7)The department shall enforce compliance with this section, which may include:(a)an administrative action; or(b)bringing a legal action.(8)If the department brings a legal action under Subsection (7)(b), the department may seek and receive the relief described in Subsection (6)(b).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 31A-1-501 is enacted to read:5. Discrimination Prohibited31A-1-501. Discriminatory practice of insurer prohibited.(1)As used in this section, "discriminate" means to treat individuals differently based on an individual's religion, race, color, age, sex, military status, marital status, national origin, disability, genetics, or ancestry.(2)An insurer may not:(a)in relation to a contract or policy for life insurance or a life annuity, unfairly discriminate between individuals of the same risk category, and an equal expectation of life, in:(i)the rates charged;(ii)the dividends or other benefits payable; or(iii)any other terms or conditions of the contract;(b)in relation to a contract or policy of disability insurance, unfairly discriminate between individuals of the same risk category, and of essentially the same hazard, in:(i)the amount of premium, policy fees, or rates charged;(ii)the benefits payable; or(iii)any other manner; or(c)in relation to a type of insurance, other than a type of insurance described in Subsection (2)(a) or (b), in the terms or conditions of an insurance contract, or in the rate or amount of premium charged, unfairly discriminate between insureds or subjects of insurance that are substantially alike in relation to insuring, risk and exposure factors, or expense elements.(3)The department shall enforce the provisions of this section in accordance with Chapter 2, Part 3, Procedures and Enforcement.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53G-2-106 is enacted to read:53G-2-106. Right to absence for religious observance or instruction.(1)An LEA shall establish a policy that authorizes a child, upon the request of the child's parent, to be absent from school to:(a)observe a religious holiday; or(b)attend religious instruction.(2)An absence described in Subsection (1) is an excused absence.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53G-6-201 is amended to read:53G-6-201. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)(a)"Absence" or "absent" means the failure of a school-age child assigned to a class or class period to attend a class or class period.(b)"Absence" or "absent" does not mean multiple tardies used to calculate an absence for the sake of a truancy.(2)"Educational neglect" means the same as that term is defined in Section 80-1-102.(3)(a)"Home-based microschool" means an individual or association of individuals that:(i)registers as a business entity in accordance with state and local laws; and(ii)for compensation, provides kindergarten through grade 12 education services to 16 or fewer students from an individual's residential dwelling, accessory dwelling unit, or residential property.(b)"Home-based microschool" does not include a daycare.(4)"Instructor" means an individual who teaches a student as part of a home-based microschool or micro-education entity.(5)(a)"Micro-education entity" means a person or association of persons that:(i)registers as a business entity in accordance with state and local laws; and(ii)for compensation, provides kindergarten through grade 12 education services to 100 students or fewer.(b)"Micro-education entity" does not include:(i)a daycare;(ii)a home-based microschool;(iii)a private school; or(iv)a school within the public education system.(6)"Minor" means an individual who is under 18 years old.(7)"Parent" includes:(a)a custodial parent of the minor;(b)a legally appointed guardian of a minor; or(c)any other person purporting to exercise any authority over the minor which could be exercised by a person described in Subsection (7)(a) or (b).(8)"School day" means the portion of a day that school is in session in which a school-age child is required to be in school for purposes of receiving instruction.(9)"School year" means the period of time designated by a local school board or charter school governing board as the school year for the school where the school-age child:(a)is enrolled; or(b)should be enrolled, if the school-age child is not enrolled in school.(10)"School-age child" means a minor who:(a)is at least six years old but younger than 18 years old; and(b)is not emancipated.(11)(a)"Truant" means a condition in which a school-age child, without a valid excuse, and subject to Subsection (11)(b), is absent for at least:(i)half of the school day; or(ii)if the school-age child is enrolled in a learner verified program, as that term is defined by the state board, the relevant amount of time under the LEA's policy regarding the LEA's continuing enrollment measure as it relates to truancy.(b)A school-age child may not be considered truant under this part more than one time during one day.(12)"Truant minor" means a school-age child who:(a)is subject to the requirements of Section 53G-6-202 or 53G-6-203; and(b)is truant.(13)(a)"Valid excuse" means:(i)an illness, which may be either mental or physical, regardless of whether the school-age child or parent provides documentation from a medical professional;(ii)mental or behavioral health of the school-age child;(iii)a family death;(iv)an approved school activity;(v)an absence permitted by a school-age child's:(A)individualized education program; or(B)Section 504 accommodation plan;(vi)competition in a rodeo sanctioned by an international, non-profit organization dedicated to the development of sportsmanship, horsemanship, and character in youth through the sport of rodeo;(vii)an absence permitted in accordance with Subsection 53G-6-803(5); or(viii)an absence described in Section 53G-2-106;(ix)an absence occasioned by a waiver described in Section 53G-10-205; or(viii)(x)any other excuse established as valid by a local school board, charter school governing board, or school district.(b)"Valid excuse" does not meaninclude a parent acknowledgment of an absence for a reason other than a reason described in Subsections (13)(a)(i) through (vii)(ix), unless specifically permitted by the local school board, charter school governing board, or school district under Subsection (13)(a)(viii)(x).

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53H-7-903 is amended to read:53H-7-903. Student religious accommodations.(1)An institution shall:(a)reasonably accommodate a student's absence from an examination or other academic requirement under the circumstances described in Subsection (2) for reasons of:(i)the student's faith or conscience; or(ii)the student's participation in an organized activity conducted under the auspices of the student's religious tradition or religious organization; and(b)ensure that an accommodation described in Subsection (1)(a) does not adversely impact the student's academic opportunities.(2)An institution shall make an accommodation described in Subsection (1) if:(a)the time at which an examination or academic requirement is scheduled to occur creates an undue hardship for a student due to the student's sincerely held religious belief; and(b)the student provides a written notice to the instructor of the course for which the student seeks the accommodation regarding the date of the examination or academic requirement for which the student seeks the accommodation.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Religious observance" means a period of time that is a day, less than a day, or more than a day that an individual, based on the individual's religious beliefs, faith, or conscience:(i)reverences or holds sacred;(ii)attends, or abstains from attending, certain events;(iii)visits, or abstains from visiting, certain locations; or(iv)exercises a religious practice.(b)"Religious practice" means an individual's engagement in, abstention from engagement in, participation in, or abstention from participation in, an act or practice based on the individual's religious beliefs, faith, or conscience.(2)An institution shall reasonably accommodate a student's religious observance or religious practice in relation to:(a)the institution's admissions process;(b)a student's attendance in class;(c)the scheduling of an examination or academic requirement; or(d)participation in a specific academic requirement.(3)An institution shall make an accommodation described in Subsection (2) if:(a)failure to provide the reasonable accommodation may or will significantly interfere with the religious observance or religious practice; and(b)(i)for a matter relating to the institution's admissions process, the potential student provides the institution with written notice that:(A)briefly describes why or how the institution's admissions process may or will significantly interfere with the religious observance or practice; and(B)describes the accommodation requested by the potential student; or(ii)for a matter described in Subsection (2)(b), (c), or (d), the student provides the course instructor with written notice that:(A)specifies the matter that significantly interferes with the religious observance or practice;(B)briefly describes why or how the matter may or will significantly interfere with the religious observance or practice; and(C)describes the accommodation requested by the student.(3)(4)An institution shall establish policies related to thean accommodation described in Subsection (1)this section that:(a)require the institution to provide thea reasonable accommodation with respect to requested in accordance with this section, which may include:(i)when the student participates in examinations and other academic requirementsan examination, academic requirement, or another matter;(ii)reasonable excused absence from class attendance;(iii)alternative ways of fulfilling an academic requirement; or(iv)other reasonable forms of accommodation;(b)allow an instructor who receives a notice described in Subsection (2)(b)(3)(b)(ii) to:(i)schedule an alternative examination time before or after thea regularly scheduled examination; or(ii)make other reasonable accommodations for other academic requirements related to the accommodationrequested under this section; and(c)require an instructor who receives a notice described in Subsection (2)(b)(3)(b)(ii) to keep confidential a student's request for the accommodation.(4)(5)(a)The commissioner shall annually:(i)create a list of the dates of religious holidays for the following two years; and(ii)distribute the list described in Subsection (4)(a)(5)(a)(i) to an institution.(b)The creation and distribution of the list described in Subsection (4)(a)(5)(a) does not prohibit a student from seeking, or an institution from granting, an accommodation for a date of a religious holiday that is not included on that list.(5)(6)An institution shall:(a)designate a point of contact for information about an accommodation described in Subsection (1)this section;(b)establish a process by which a student may submit a grievance with regards to implementation of this section; and(c)publish the following information on the institution's website and update the information annually:(i)the institution's religious accommodation policies described in Subsection (3)(4);(ii)the point of contact described in Subsection (5)(a)(6)(a);(iii)the list described in Subsection (4)(5);(iv)a description of the general procedure to request an accommodation described in Subsection (1)(2); and(v)the grievance process described in Subsection (5)(b)(6)(b).

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.